Missouri, session 2026, HB3063.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 573.010, 573.110, 573.112, 589.400, 589.414, and 595.045,
RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
573.010, 573.110, 573.112, 573.114, 589.400, 589.414, and 595.045, to read as follows:
573.010. As used in this chapter the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, juice bar, restaurant, bottle club, or other
commercial establishment, regardless of whether alcoholic beverages are served, which
regularly features persons who appear semi-nude;
(2) "Characterized by", describing the essential character or dominant theme of an
item;
(3) "Child", any person under the age of fourteen;
(4) "Child [pornography] sexual abuse material":
(a) Any obscene material or performance depicting sexual conduct, sexual contact as
defined in section 566.010, or a sexual performance and which has as one of its participants or
portrays as an observer of such conduct, contact, or performance a minor; [or]
(b) Any visual depiction, including any photograph, film, video, picture, or computer
or computer-generated image or picture, whether made or produced by electronic,
mechanical, or other means, of sexually explicit conduct where:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3063 2
a. The production of such visual depiction involves the use of a minor engaging in
sexually explicit conduct;
b. Such visual depiction is a digital image, computer image, or computer-generated
image that is, or is indistinguishable from, that of a minor engaging in sexually explicit
conduct, in that the depiction is such that an ordinary person viewing the depiction would
conclude that the depiction is of an actual minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct,
regardless of whether the minor was actually engaged in sexually explicit conduct at the
time the visual depiction was created; or
c. Such visual depiction has been created, adapted, or modified to show that an
identifiable minor is engaging in sexually explicit conduct. "Identifiable minor" means a
person who was a minor at the time the visual depiction was created, adapted, or modified; or
whose image as a minor was used in creating, adapting, or modifying the visual depiction;
and who is recognizable as an actual person by the person's face, likeness, or other
distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature. The
term identifiable minor shall not be construed to require proof of the actual identity of the
identifiable minor; or
(c) Any anatomically correct doll, mannequin, or robot, or any other item, with
features of, or with features that resemble those of, a minor under eighteen years of age
intended to be used for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any
person, or for the purpose of terrorizing or causing emotional distress to any person;
(5) "Employ", "employee", or "employment", any person who performs any service
on the premises of a sexually oriented business, on a full-time, part-time, or contract basis,
whether or not the person is denominated an employee, independent contractor, agent, or
otherwise. Employee does not include a person exclusively on the premises for repair or
maintenance of the premises or for the delivery of goods to the premises;
(6) "Explicit sexual material", any pictorial or three-dimensional material depicting
human masturbation, deviate sexual intercourse, sexual intercourse, direct physical
stimulation or unclothed genitals, sadomasochistic abuse, or emphasizing the depiction of
postpubertal human genitals; provided, however, that works of art or of anthropological
significance shall not be deemed to be within the foregoing definition;
(7) "Furnish", to issue, sell, give, provide, lend, mail, deliver, transfer, circulate,
disseminate, present, exhibit or otherwise provide;
(8) "Material", anything printed or written, or any picture, drawing, photograph,
motion picture film, videotape or videotape production, or pictorial representation, or any
recording or transcription, or any mechanical, chemical, or electrical reproduction, or stored
computer data, or anything which is or may be used as a means of communication. Material

HB 3063 3
includes undeveloped photographs, molds, printing plates, stored computer data and other
latent representational objects;
(9) "Minor", any person less than eighteen years of age;
(10) "Nudity" or "state of nudity", the showing of the human genitals, pubic area,
vulva, anus, anal cleft, or the female breast with less than a fully opaque covering of any part
of the nipple or areola;
(11) "Obscene", any material or performance if, taken as a whole:
(a) Applying contemporary community standards, its predominant appeal is to
prurient interest in sex; and
(b) The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find the
material depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way; and
(c) A reasonable person would find the material lacks serious literary, artistic,
political or scientific value;
(12) "Operator", any person on the premises of a sexually oriented business who
causes the business to function, puts or keeps the business in operation, or is authorized to
manage the business or exercise overall operational control of the business premises. A
person may be found to be operating or causing to be operated a sexually oriented business
whether or not such person is an owner, part owner, or licensee of the business;
(13) "Performance", any play, motion picture film, videotape, dance or exhibition
performed before an audience of one or more;
(14) "Pornographic for minors", any material or performance if the following apply:
(a) The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find
that the material or performance, taken as a whole, has a tendency to cater or appeal to a
prurient interest of minors; and
(b) The material or performance depicts or describes nudity, sexual conduct, the
condition of human genitals when in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal, or
sadomasochistic abuse in a way which is patently offensive to the average person applying
contemporary adult community standards with respect to what is suitable for minors; and
(c) The material or performance, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic,
political, or scientific value for minors;
(15) "Premises", the real property upon which a sexually oriented business is located,
and all appurtenances thereto and buildings thereon, including but not limited to the sexually
oriented business, the grounds, private walkways, and parking lots or parking garages or both;
(16) "Promote", to manufacture, issue, sell, provide, mail, deliver, transfer, transmute,
publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, or advertise, or to offer or agree to
do the same, by any means including a computer;
(17) "Regularly", the consistent and repeated doing of the act so described;

HB 3063 4
(18) "Sadomasochistic abuse", flagellation or torture by or upon a person as an act of
sexual stimulation or gratification;
(19) "Semi-nude" or "state of semi-nudity", the showing of the female breast below a
horizontal line across the top of the areola and extending across the width of the breast at such
point, or the showing of the male or female buttocks. Such definition includes the lower
portion of the human female breast, but shall not include any portion of the cleavage of the
female breasts exhibited by a bikini, dress, blouse, shirt, leotard, or similar wearing apparel
provided the areola is not exposed in whole or in part;
(20) "Sexual conduct", actual or simulated, normal or perverted acts of human
masturbation; deviate sexual intercourse; sexual intercourse; or physical contact with a
person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or the breast of a female in an act
of apparent sexual stimulation or gratification or any sadomasochistic abuse or acts including
100 animals or any latent objects in an act of apparent sexual stimulation or gratification;
101 (21) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
102 (a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-
103 anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;
104 (b) Bestiality;
105 (c) Masturbation;
106 (d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
107 (e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person;
108 (22) "Sexually oriented business" includes:
109 (a) An adult bookstore or adult video store. "Adult bookstore" or "adult video store"
110 means a commercial establishment which, as one of its principal business activities, offers for
111 sale or rental for any form of consideration any one or more of the following: books,
112 magazines, periodicals, or other printed matter, or photographs, films, motion pictures, video
113 cassettes, compact discs, digital video discs, slides, or other visual representations which are
114 characterized by their emphasis upon the display of specified sexual activities or specified
115 anatomical areas. A principal business activity exists where the commercial establishment:
116 a. Has a substantial portion of its displayed merchandise which consists of such
117 items; or
118 b. Has a substantial portion of the wholesale value of its displayed merchandise
119 which consists of such items; or
120 c. Has a substantial portion of the retail value of its displayed merchandise which
121 consists of such items; or
122 d. Derives a substantial portion of its revenues from the sale or rental, for any form of
123 consideration, of such items; or

HB 3063 5
124 e. Maintains a substantial section of its interior business space for the sale or rental of
125 such items; or
126 f. Maintains an adult arcade. "Adult arcade" means any place to which the public is
127 permitted or invited wherein coin-operated or slug-operated or electronically, electrically, or
128 mechanically controlled still or motion picture machines, projectors, or other image-
129 producing devices are regularly maintained to show images to five or fewer persons per
130 machine at any one time, and where the images so displayed are characterized by their
131 emphasis upon matter exhibiting specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas;
132 (b) An adult cabaret;
133 (c) An adult motion picture theater. "Adult motion picture theater" means a
134 commercial establishment where films, motion pictures, video cassettes, slides, or similar
135 photographic reproductions, which are characterized by their emphasis upon the display of
136 specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas are regularly shown to more than five
137 persons for any form of consideration;
138 (d) A semi-nude model studio. "Semi-nude model studio" means a place where
139 persons regularly appear in a state of semi-nudity for money or any form of consideration in
140 order to be observed, sketched, drawn, painted, sculptured, photographed, or similarly
141 depicted by other persons. Such definition shall not apply to any place where persons
142 appearing in a state of semi-nudity do so in a modeling class operated:
143 a. By a college, junior college, or university supported entirely or partly by taxation;
144 b. By a private college or university which maintains and operates educational
145 programs in which credits are transferable to a college, junior college, or university supported
146 entirely or partly by taxation; or
147 c. In a structure:
148 (i) Which has no sign visible from the exterior of the structure and no other
149 advertising that indicates a semi-nude person is available for viewing; and
150 (ii) Where, in order to participate in a class, a student must enroll at least three days in
151 advance of the class;
152 (e) A sexual encounter center. "Sexual encounter center" means a business or
153 commercial enterprise that, as one of its principal purposes, purports to offer for any form of
154 consideration physical contact in the form of wrestling or tumbling between two or more
155 persons when one or more of the persons is semi-nude;
156 (23) "Sexual performance", any performance, or part thereof, which includes sexual
157 conduct by a child who is less than eighteen years of age;
158 (24) "Specified anatomical areas" include:
159 (a) Less than completely and opaquely covered: human genitals, pubic region,
160 buttock, and female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola; and

HB 3063 6
161 (b) Human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely and
162 opaquely covered;
163 (25) "Specified sexual activity", includes any of the following:
164 (a) Intercourse, oral copulation, masturbation, or sodomy; or
165 (b) Excretory functions as a part of or in connection with any of the activities
166 described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
167 (26) "Substantial", at least thirty percent of the item or items so modified;
168 (27) "Visual depiction", includes undeveloped film and videotape, and data stored on
169 computer disk or by electronic means which is capable of conversion into a visual image.
573.110. 1. This section and sections 571.112 and 573.114 shall be known and
may be cited as "Evan's Voice Act".
2. As used in this section and [section] sections 573.112 and 573.114, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Computer", a device that accepts, processes, stores, retrieves, or outputs data and
includes, but is not limited to, auxiliary storage and telecommunications devices connected to
computers;
(2) "Computer program", a series of coded instructions or statements in a form
acceptable to a computer that causes the computer to process data and supply the results of the
data processing;
(3) "Data", a representation in any form of information, knowledge, facts, concepts,
or instructions including, but not limited to, program documentation, that is prepared or has
been prepared in a formalized manner and is stored or processed in or transmitted by a
computer or in a system or network. Data is considered property and may be in any form
including, but not limited to, printouts, magnetic or optical storage media, punch cards, data
stored internally in the memory of the computer, or data stored externally that is accessible by
the computer;
(4) "Image", a photograph, film, videotape, digital recording, or other depiction or
portrayal of an object, including a human body;
(5) "Intimate parts", the fully unclothed, partially unclothed, or transparently clothed
genitals, pubic area, or anus or, if the person is female, a partially or fully exposed nipple,
including exposure through transparent clothing;
(6) "Private mobile radio services", private land mobile radio services and other
communications services characterized by the public service commission as private mobile
radio services;
(7) "Public mobile services", air-to-ground radio telephone services, cellular radio
telecommunications services, offshore radio, rural radio services, public land mobile
telephone services, and other common carrier radio communications services;

HB 3063 7
(8) "Sexual act", sexual penetration, masturbation, or sexual activity;
(9) "Sexual activity", any:
(a) Knowing touching or fondling by the victim or another person or animal, either
directly or through clothing, of the sex organs, anus, or breast of the victim or another person
or animal for the purpose of sexual gratification or arousal;
(b) Transfer or transmission of semen upon any part of the clothed or unclothed body
of the victim for the purpose of sexual gratification or arousal of the victim or another;
(c) Act of urination within a sexual context;
(d) Bondage, fetter, sadism, or masochism; or
(e) Sadomasochism abuse in any sexual context.
[2.] 3. A person commits the offense of nonconsensual dissemination of private
sexual images if he or she:
(1) Intentionally disseminates an image with the intent to harass, threaten, or coerce
another person:
(a) [Who is at least eighteen years of age;
(b)] Who is identifiable from the image itself or information displayed in connection
with the image; and
[(c)] (b) Who is engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed, in whole
or in part;
(2) Obtains the image under circumstances in which a reasonable person would know
or understand that the image was to remain private; and
(3) Knows or should have known that the person in the image did not consent to the
dissemination.
[3.] 4. The following activities are exempt from the provisions of this section:
(1) The intentional dissemination of an image of another identifiable person who is
engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed if the dissemination is made for
the purpose of a criminal investigation that is otherwise lawful;
(2) The intentional dissemination of an image of another identifiable person who is
engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed if the dissemination is for the
purpose of, or in connection with, the reporting of unlawful conduct;
(3) The intentional dissemination of an image of another identifiable person who is
engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed if the image involves voluntary
exposure in a public or commercial setting; or
(4) The intentional dissemination of an image of another identifiable person who is
engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed if the dissemination serves a
lawful public purpose.

HB 3063 8
[4.] 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability upon the
following entities solely as a result of content or information provided by another person:
(1) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 230(f)(2);
(2) A provider of public mobile services or private mobile radio services; or
(3) A telecommunications network or broadband provider.
[5.] 6. A person convicted under this section is subject to the forfeiture provisions
under sections 513.600 to 513.660.
[6.] 7. The offense of nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a class
D felony, unless the image was of a minor or of a vulnerable person, in which case it is a
class C felony.
[7.] 8. In addition to the criminal penalties listed in subsection 6 of this section, the
person in violation of the provisions of this section shall also be subject to a private cause of
action from the depicted person. Any successful private cause of action brought under this
subsection shall result in an award equal to ten thousand dollars or actual damages, whichever
is greater, and in addition shall include attorney's fees. Humiliation or embarrassment shall
be an adequate showing that the plaintiff has incurred damages; however, no physical
manifestation of either humiliation or embarrassment is necessary for damages to be shown.
573.112. 1. A person commits the offense of threatening the nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images if he or she gains or attempts to gain anything of
value, or coerces or attempts to coerce another person to act or refrain from acting, by
threatening to disseminate an image of another person, which was obtained under
circumstances in which a reasonable person would know or understand that the image was
to remain private, against the will of such person:
(1) [Who is at least eighteen years of age;
(2)] Who is identifiable from the image itself or information displayed in connection
with the image; and
[(3)] (2) Who is engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed, in whole
or in part.
2. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection, the offense
of threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a class E felony,
unless it is a second offense, in which case it is a class D felony. Any third or subsequent
offense of threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a
class C felony.
(2) If the image was of a minor or of a vulnerable person, the offense of
threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a class B felony.

HB 3063 9
(3) If the threat of the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is
the proximate cause of serious physical injury or death of a person, the offense of
threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a class B felony.
573.114. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 557.011, 558.019, and
559.021 to the contrary, a person found guilty of violating section 573.110 or 573.112
shall be ordered by the sentencing court to pay restitution to the victim of the offense.
The minimum restitution for a victim of a person found guilty of violating section
573.110 or 573.112 ordered by the court shall be in the amount determined by the court
necessary to compensate the victim for the mental and physical rehabilitation of the
victim, any lost income or educational disruption, relocation or housing assistance for
the victim, or costs for removal of the image from any computer, computer program,
interactive computer service as such term is defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 230(f)(2),
provider of public mobile services or private mobile radio services, or
telecommunications network or broadband provider.
589.400. 1. Sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall apply to:
(1) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter adjudicated for an
offense referenced in section 589.414, unless such person is exempt from registering under
subsection 9 or 10 of this section or section 589.401;
(2) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter convicted of, been
found guilty of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to committing, attempting to commit, or
conspiring to commit one or more of the following offenses: kidnapping or kidnapping in the
first degree when the victim was a child and the defendant was not a parent or guardian of the
child; abuse of a child under section 568.060 when such abuse is sexual in nature; felonious
restraint or kidnapping in the second degree when the victim was a child and the defendant is
not a parent or guardian of the child; sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a resident of a
nursing home or sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the
first or second degree; endangering the welfare of a child under section 568.045 when the
endangerment is sexual in nature; genital mutilation of a female child, under section 568.065;
promoting prostitution in the first degree; promoting prostitution in the second degree;
promoting prostitution in the third degree; sexual exploitation of a minor; promoting child
pornography in the first degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting child
sexual abuse material in the first degree; promoting child pornography in the second
degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting child sexual abuse material in
the second degree; possession of child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
possession of child sexual abuse material; furnishing pornographic material to minors;
public display of explicit sexual material; coercing acceptance of obscene material; promoting
obscenity in the first degree; promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in the second

HB 3063 10
degree; incest; use of a child in a sexual performance; or promoting sexual performance by a
child; patronizing prostitution if the individual the person patronizes is less than eighteen
years of age; grooming of a minor; nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual
images; or threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images;
(3) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been committed to the department of
mental health as a criminal sexual psychopath;
(4) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been found not guilty as a result of
mental disease or defect of any offense referenced in section 589.414;
(5) Any juvenile certified as an adult and transferred to a court of general jurisdiction
who has been adjudicated for an offense listed under section 589.414;
(6) Any juvenile fourteen years of age or older at the time of the offense who has
been adjudicated for an offense which is equal to or more severe than aggravated sexual abuse
under 18 U.S.C. Section 2241, which shall include any attempt or conspiracy to commit such
offense;
(7) Any person who is a resident of this state who has, since July 1, 1979, been or is
hereafter adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country,
or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed in this state,
would constitute an offense listed under section 589.414, or has been or is required to register
in another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is
required to register under tribal, federal, or military law; or
(8) Any person who has been or is required to register in another state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is required to register under tribal,
federal, or military law and who works or attends an educational institution, whether public or
private in nature, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
institution of higher education on a full-time or on a part-time basis or has a temporary
residence in Missouri. "Part-time" in this subdivision means for more than seven days in any
twelve-month period.
2. Any person to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply shall, within three business
days of adjudication, release from incarceration, or placement upon probation, register with
the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county in which such
person resides unless such person has already registered in that county for the same offense.
For any juvenile under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section, within three business
days of adjudication or release from commitment to the division of youth services, the
department of mental health, or other placement, such juvenile shall register with the chief
law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county in which he or she resides
unless he or she has already registered in such county or city not within a county for the same
offense. Any person to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply if not currently registered in

HB 3063 11
their county of residence shall register with the chief law enforcement official of such county
or city not within a county within three business days. The chief law enforcement official
shall forward a copy of the registration form required by section 589.407 to a city, town,
village, or campus law enforcement agency located within the county of the chief law
enforcement official.
3. The registration requirements of sections 589.400 through 589.425 shall be as
provided under subsection 4 of this section unless:
(1) All offenses requiring registration are reversed, vacated, or set aside;
(2) The registrant is no longer required to register and his or her name shall be
removed from the registry under the provisions of section 589.414; or
(3) The court orders the removal or exemption of such person from the registry under
section 589.401.
4. The registration requirements shall be as follows:
(1) Fifteen years if the offender is a tier I sex offender as provided under section
589.414;
(2) Twenty-five years if the offender is a tier II sex offender as provided under section
589.414; or
(3) The life of the offender if the offender is a tier III sex offender.
5. (1) The registration period shall be reduced as described in subdivision (3) of this
subsection for a sex offender who maintains a clean record for the periods described under
subdivision (2) of this subsection by:
(a) Not being adjudicated of any offense for which imprisonment for more than one
year may be imposed;
(b) Not being adjudicated of any sex offense;
(c) Successfully completing any periods of supervised release, probation, or parole;
and
(d) Successfully completing an appropriate sex offender treatment program certified
by the attorney general.
(2) In the case of a:
(a) Tier I sex offender, the period during which the clean record shall be maintained is
ten years;
(b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated delinquent for the offense which required
registration in a sex offender registry under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the period during
which the clean record shall be maintained is twenty-five years.
(3) In the case of a:
(a) Tier I sex offender, the reduction is five years;

HB 3063 12
(b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated delinquent, the reduction is from life to that
period for which the clean record under paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of this subsection is
maintained.
100 6. For processing an initial sex offender registration the chief law enforcement officer
101 of the county or city not within a county may charge the offender registering a fee of up to ten
102 dollars.
103 7. For processing any change in registration required pursuant to section 589.414 the
104 chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county may charge the person
105 changing their registration a fee of five dollars for each change made after the initial
106 registration.
107 8. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
108 required to register for being adjudicated for the offense of felonious restraint of a nonsexual
109 nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the child,
110 nonsexual child abuse that was committed under section 568.060, or kidnapping of a
111 nonsexual nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the
112 child shall be removed from the registry. However, such person shall remain on the sexual
113 offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to register under
114 sections 589.400 to 589.425.
115 9. The following persons shall be exempt from registering as a sexual offender upon
116 petition to the court of jurisdiction under section 589.401; except that, such person shall
117 remain on the sexual offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to
118 register under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
119 (1) Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
120 required to register for a sexual offense involving:
121 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim or
122 any other individual involved, if the victim was an adult, unless the adult was under the
123 custodial authority of the offender at the time of the offense; or
124 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim,
125 the victim was at least fourteen years of age, and the offender was not more than four years
126 older than the victim at the time of the offense; or
127 (2) Any person currently required to register for the following sexual offenses:
128 (a) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020;
129 (b) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under section 573.030;
130 (c) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section 573.040;
131 (d) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060;
132 (e) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065;

HB 3063 13
133 (f) Trafficking for the purpose of slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced
134 labor under section 566.206;
135 (g) Abusing an individual through forced labor under section 566.203;
136 (h) Contributing to human trafficking through the misuse of documentation under
137 section 566.215; or
138 (i) Acting as an international marriage broker and failing to provide the information
139 and notice as required under section 578.475.
140 10. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry for having been adjudicated
141 for a tier I or II offense or adjudicated delinquent for a tier III offense or other comparable
142 offenses listed under section 589.414 may file a petition under section 589.401.
143 11. Any nonresident worker, including work as a volunteer or intern, or nonresident
144 student shall register for the duration of such person's employment, including participation as
145 a volunteer or intern, or attendance at any school of higher education whether public or
146 private, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or institution of
147 higher education on a full-time or part-time basis in this state unless granted relief under
148 section 589.401. Any registered offender shall provide information regarding any place in
149 which the offender is staying when away from his or her residence for seven or more days,
150 including the period of time the offender is staying in such place. Any registered offender
151 from another state who has a temporary residence in this state and resides more than seven
152 days in a twelve-month period shall register for the duration of such person's temporary
153 residency unless granted relief under section 589.401.
589.414. 1. Any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register shall,
within three business days, appear in person to the chief law enforcement officer of the
county or city not within a county if there is a change to any of the following information:
(1) Name;
(2) Residence;
(3) Employment, including status as a volunteer or intern;
(4) Student status; or
(5) A termination to any of the items listed in this subsection.
2. Any person required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall, within
three business days, notify the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within
a county of any changes to the following information:
(1) Vehicle information;
(2) Temporary lodging information;
(3) Temporary residence information;
(4) Email addresses, instant messaging addresses, and any other designations used in
internet communications, postings, or telephone communications; or

HB 3063 14
(5) Telephone or other cellular number, including any new forms of electronic
communication.
3. The chief law enforcement official in the county or city not within a county shall
immediately forward the registration changes described under subsections 1 and 2 of this
section to the Missouri state highway patrol within three business days.
4. If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes such
person's residence or address to a different county or city not within a county, the person shall
appear in person and shall inform both the chief law enforcement official with whom the
person last registered and the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a
county having jurisdiction over the new residence or address in writing within three business
days of such new address and phone number, if the phone number is also changed. If any
person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes his or her state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of
residence, the person shall appear in person and shall inform both the chief law enforcement
official with whom the person was last registered and the chief law enforcement official of the
area in the new state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal,
or military jurisdiction having jurisdiction over the new residence or address within three
business days of such new address. Whenever a registrant changes residence, the chief law
enforcement official of the county or city not within a county where the person was
previously registered shall inform the Missouri state highway patrol of the change within
three business days. When the registrant is changing the residence to a new state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall inform the responsible official in the new state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of
residence within three business days.
5. Tier I sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of this
section, shall report in person to the chief law enforcement official annually in the month of
their birth to verify the information contained in their statement made pursuant to section
589.407. Tier I sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
(a) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is eighteen
years of age or older;
(b) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
and the punishment is less than one year;
(c) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the punishment is less
than a year;
(d) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 with sexual motivation;

HB 3063 15
(e) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130;
(f) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is less than one year;
(g) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a nursing facility resident or
vulnerable person;
(h) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public duty
under section 566.145 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
(i) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
(j) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
victim is eighteen years of age or older;
(k) Possession of child pornography under section 573.037 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026;
(l) Possession of child sexual abuse material under section 573.037;
(m) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093;
[(m)] (n) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under section 566.095;
[(n)] (o) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068 as it existed
prior to January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less than one year; [or
(o)] (p) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the victim is less than eighteen
years of age; or
(q) Grooming of a minor under section 566.152;
(2) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of an
offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier I sexual
offenses listed in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable
to those described as tier I offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act,
Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
6. Tier II sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of this
section, shall report semiannually in person in the month of their birth and six months
thereafter to the chief law enforcement official to verify the information contained in their
statement made pursuant to section 589.407. Tier II sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
(a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is
sixteen to seventeen years of age;
(b) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is
between thirteen and fourteen years of age;
(c) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to
seventeen years of age;

HB 3063 16
(d) Enticement of a child under section 566.151;
(e) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
(f) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section 573.023;
(g) Promoting child pornography in the first degree under section 573.025 as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026;
(h) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the first degree under section
573.025;
(i) Promoting child pornography in the second degree under section 573.035 as it
100 existed prior to August 28, 2026;
101 (j) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the second degree under section
102 573.035;
103 [(i)] (k) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030;
104 [(j)] (l) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public
105 duty under section 566.145 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
106 [(k)] (m) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
107 thirteen to seventeen years of age;
108 [(l)] (n) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first
109 offense and the penalty is a term of imprisonment of more than a year; [or
110 (m)] (o) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a minor under section 566.153;
111 (p) Nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images under section 573.110
112 if the victim is seventeen years of age or under or if coercion of the victim was sexual in
113 nature; or
114 (q) Threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images under
115 section 573.112 if the victim is seventeen years of age or under or if coercion of the
116 victim was sexual in nature;
117 (2) Any person who is adjudicated of an offense comparable to a tier I offense listed
118 in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state
119 failure to register offense and who is already required to register as a tier I offender due to
120 having been adjudicated of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
121 (3) Any person who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District
122 of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense
123 of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier II sexual offenses
124 listed in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable to those
125 described as tier II offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I
126 of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.

HB 3063 17
127 7. Tier III sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of
128 this section, shall report in person to the chief law enforcement official every ninety days to
129 verify the information contained in their statement made under section 589.407. Tier III
130 sexual offenders include:
131 (1) Any offender registered as a predatory [sexual offender as defined in section
132 566.123 or a] or persistent sexual offender as defined in section [566.124] 566.125;
133 (2) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the crime of:
134 (a) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
135 (b) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032;
136 (c) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
137 (d) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 if the
138 offense is sexual in nature;
139 (e) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
140 (f) Statutory sodomy under section 566.062;
141 (g) Statutory sodomy under section 566.064 if the victim is under sixteen years of
142 age;
143 (h) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
144 (i) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if the offense is a
145 second or subsequent offense;
146 (j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is under
147 thirteen years of age;
148 (k) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 if the victim is under
149 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian;
150 (l) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
151 (m) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
152 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is greater than a year;
153 (n) Incest under section 568.020;
154 (o) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 with
155 sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse with a victim under eighteen years of age;
156 (p) Child molestation in the first degree under section 566.067;
157 (q) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068;
158 (r) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is under
159 thirteen years of age;
160 (s) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if the victim is
161 under eighteen years of age;
162 (t) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 if the victim is
163 under eighteen years of age;

HB 3063 18
164 (u) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 if the victim is
165 under eighteen years of age;
166 (v) Promoting travel for prostitution under section 567.085 if the victim is under
167 eighteen years of age;
168 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
169 victim is under eighteen years of age;
170 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree under section 566.210;
171 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree under section 566.211;
172 (z) Genital mutilation of a female child under section 568.065;
173 (aa) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034;
174 (bb) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
175 under thirteen years of age;
176 (cc) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the penalty is a term
177 of imprisonment of more than a year;
178 (dd) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the offender is a persistent
179 offender;
180 (ee) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
181 victim is under thirteen years of age;
182 (ff) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public
183 duty under section 566.145 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
184 (gg) [Sexual intercourse with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145;
185 (hh)] Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is under
186 thirteen years of age;
187 [(ii)] (hh) Use of a child in a sexual performance under section 573.200; or
188 [(jj)] (ii) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under section 573.205;
189 (3) Any offender who is adjudicated for a crime comparable to a tier I or tier II
190 offense listed in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425, or other
191 comparable out-of-state failure to register offense, who has been or is already required to
192 register as a tier II offender because of having been adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier I
193 offenses, or combination of a tier I offense and failure to register offense, on a previous
194 occasion;
195 (4) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of
196 Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense of
197 a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to a tier III offense listed in this
198 section or a tier III offense under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I
199 of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248; or

HB 3063 19
200 (5) Any offender who is adjudicated in Missouri for any offense of a sexual nature
201 requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is not classified as a tier I or tier
202 II offense in this section.
203 8. In addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 7 of this section, all Missouri
204 registrants who work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend any school whether
205 public or private, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
206 institution of higher education, on a full-time or part-time basis or have a temporary residence
207 in this state shall be required to report in person to the chief law enforcement officer in the
208 area of the state where they work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend any
209 school or training and register in that state. "Part-time" in this subsection means for more
210 than seven days in any twelve-month period.
211 9. If a person who is required to register as a sexual offender under sections 589.400
212 to 589.425 changes or obtains a new online identifier as defined in section 43.651, the person
213 shall report such information in the same manner as a change of residence before using such
214 online identifier.
595.045. 1. There is established in the state treasury the "Crime Victims'
Compensation Fund". A surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed as costs
in each court proceeding filed in any court in the state in all criminal cases including
violations of any county ordinance or any violation of criminal or traffic laws of the state,
including an infraction and violation of a municipal ordinance; except that no such fee shall
be collected in any proceeding in any court when the proceeding or the defendant has been
dismissed by the court or when costs are to be paid by the state, county, or municipality. A
surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed as costs in a juvenile court
proceeding in which a child is found by the court to come within the applicable provisions of
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the moneys collected
by clerks of the courts pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall be
collected and disbursed in accordance with sections 488.010 to 488.020 and shall be payable
to the director of the department of revenue.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit annually the amount of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars to the state forensic laboratory account administered by the department of
public safety to provide financial assistance to defray expenses of crime laboratories if such
analytical laboratories are registered with the federal Drug Enforcement Agency or the
Missouri department of health and senior services. Subject to appropriations made therefor,
such funds shall be distributed by the department of public safety to the crime laboratories
serving the courts of this state making analysis of a controlled substance or analysis of blood,
breath or urine in relation to a court proceeding.

HB 3063 20
4. The remaining funds collected under subsection 1 of this section shall be denoted
to the payment of an annual appropriation for the administrative and operational costs of the
office for victims of crime and, if a statewide automated crime victim notification system is
established pursuant to section 650.310, to the monthly payment of expenditures actually
incurred in the operation of such system. Additional remaining funds shall be subject to the
following provisions:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of revenue or the director's designee shall
determine the balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund available to
satisfy the amount of compensation payable pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075,
excluding sections 595.050 and 595.055;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first of each month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds available
to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund and fifty percent to the services to
victims' fund established in section 595.100.
5. The director of revenue or such director's designee shall at least monthly report the
moneys paid pursuant to this section into the crime victims' compensation fund and the
services to victims fund to the department of public safety.
6. The moneys collected by clerks of municipal courts pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section shall be collected and disbursed as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. Five
percent of such moneys shall be payable to the city treasury of the city from which such funds
were collected. The remaining ninety-five percent of such moneys shall be payable to the
director of revenue. The funds received by the director of revenue pursuant to this subsection
shall be distributed as follows:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of revenue or the director's designee shall
determine the balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund available to
satisfy the amount of compensation payable pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075,
excluding sections 595.050 and 595.055;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first of each month the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds available
to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund and fifty percent to the services to
victims' fund established in section 595.100.
7. These funds shall be subject to a biennial audit by the Missouri state auditor. Such
audit shall include all records associated with crime victims' compensation funds collected,
held or disbursed by any state agency.
8. In addition to the moneys collected pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, the
court shall enter a judgment in favor of the state of Missouri, payable to the crime victims'
compensation fund, of sixty-eight dollars upon a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for a class

HB 3063 21
A or B felony; forty-six dollars upon a plea of guilty or finding of guilt for a class C, D, or E
felony; five hundred dollars but not more than five thousand dollars upon a plea of
guilty or a finding of guilt for the offense of nonconsensual dissemination of private
sexual images under section 573.110 or the offense of threatening the nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images under section 573.112; and ten dollars upon a plea
of guilty or a finding of guilt for any misdemeanor under Missouri law except for those in
chapter 252 relating to fish and game, chapter 302 relating to drivers' and commercial drivers'
license, chapter 303 relating to motor vehicle financial responsibility, chapter 304 relating to
traffic regulations, chapter 306 relating to watercraft regulation and licensing, and chapter 307
relating to vehicle equipment regulations. Any clerk of the court receiving moneys pursuant
to such judgments shall collect and disburse such crime victims' compensation judgments in
the manner provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. Such funds shall be payable to the state
treasury and deposited to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund.
9. The clerk of the court processing such funds shall maintain records of all
dispositions described in subsection 1 of this section and all dispositions where a judgment
has been entered against a defendant in favor of the state of Missouri in accordance with this
section; all payments made on judgments for alcohol-related traffic offenses; and any
judgment or portion of a judgment entered but not collected. These records shall be subject to
audit by the state auditor. The clerk of each court transmitting such funds shall report
separately the amount of dollars collected on judgments entered for alcohol-related traffic
offenses from other crime victims' compensation collections or services to victims
collections.
10. The department of revenue shall maintain records of funds transmitted to the
crime victims' compensation fund by each reporting court and collections pursuant to
subsection 16 of this section and shall maintain separate records of collection for alcohol-
related offenses.
11. The state courts administrator shall include in the annual report required by
section 476.350 the circuit court caseloads and the number of crime victims' compensation
judgments entered.
12. All awards made to injured victims under sections 595.010 to 595.105 and all
appropriations for administration of sections 595.010 to 595.105, except sections 595.050 and
595.055, shall be made from the crime victims' compensation fund. Any unexpended balance
remaining in the crime victims' compensation fund at the end of each biennium shall not be
subject to the provision of section 33.080 requiring the transfer of such unexpended balance
to the ordinary revenue fund of the state, but shall remain in the crime victims' compensation
fund. In the event that there are insufficient funds in the crime victims' compensation fund to
pay all claims in full, all claims shall be paid on a pro rata basis. If there are no funds in the

HB 3063 22
crime victims' compensation fund, then no claim shall be paid until funds have again
accumulated in the crime victims' compensation fund. When sufficient funds become
available from the fund, awards which have not been paid shall be paid in chronological order
100 with the oldest paid first. In the event an award was to be paid in installments and some
101 remaining installments have not been paid due to a lack of funds, then when funds do become
102 available that award shall be paid in full. All such awards on which installments remain due
103 shall be paid in full in chronological order before any other postdated award shall be paid.
104 Any award pursuant to this subsection is specifically not a claim against the state, if it cannot
105 be paid due to a lack of funds in the crime victims' compensation fund.
106 13. When judgment is entered against a defendant as provided in this section and such
107 sum, or any part thereof, remains unpaid, there shall be withheld from any disbursement,
108 payment, benefit, compensation, salary, or other transfer of money from the state of Missouri
109 to such defendant an amount equal to the unpaid amount of such judgment. Such amount
110 shall be paid forthwith to the crime victims' compensation fund and satisfaction of such
111 judgment shall be entered on the court record. Under no circumstances shall the general
112 revenue fund be used to reimburse court costs or pay for such judgment. The director of the
113 department of corrections shall have the authority to pay into the crime victims' compensation
114 fund from an offender's compensation or account the amount owed by the offender to the
115 crime victims' compensation fund, provided that the offender has failed to pay the amount
116 owed to the fund prior to entering a correctional facility of the department of corrections.
117 14. All interest earned as a result of investing funds in the crime victims'
118 compensation fund shall be paid into the crime victims' compensation fund and not into the
119 general revenue of this state.
120 15. Any person who knowingly makes a fraudulent claim or false statement in
121 connection with any claim hereunder is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
122 16. The department may receive gifts and contributions for the benefit of crime
123 victims. Such gifts and contributions shall be credited to the crime victims' compensation
124 fund as used solely for compensating victims under the provisions of sections 595.010 to
125 595.075.
✔